Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-284.1.
Placement in secure local facility.

If a juvenile 14 years of age or older is found to have committed an offense which if committed by an adult would be punishable by confinement in a state or local correctional facility as defined in §

53.1-1

, and the court determines (i) that the juvenile has not previously been and is not currently adjudicated delinquent of a violent juvenile felony or found guilty of a violent juvenile felony, (ii) that the juvenile has not been released from the custody of the Department within the previous 18 months, (iii) that the interests of the juvenile and the community require that the juvenile be placed under legal restraint or discipline, and (iv) that other placements authorized by this title will not serve the best interests of the juvenile, then the court may order the juvenile confined in a detention home or other secure facility for juveniles for a period not to exceed six months from the date the order is entered, for a single offense or multiple offenses. However, if the single offense or multiple offenses, which if committed by an adult would be punishable as a felony or a Class 1 misdemeanor, caused the death of any person, then the court may order the juvenile confined in a detention home or other secure facility for juveniles for a period not to exceed 12 months from the date the order is entered.The period of confinement ordered may exceed 30 calendar days if the juvenile has had an assessment completed by the secure facility to which he is ordered concerning the appropriateness of the placement.

If the period of confinement in a detention home or other secure facility for juveniles is to exceed 30 calendar days, and the juvenile is eligible for commitment pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

, then the court shall order the juvenile committed to the Department, but suspend such commitment. In suspending the commitment to the Department as provided for in this subsection, the court shall specify conditions for the juvenile’s satisfactory completion of one or more community or facility based treatment programs as may be appropriate for the juvenile’s rehabilitation.

During any period of confinement which exceeds 30 calendar days ordered pursuant to this section, the court shall conduct a mandatory review hearing at least once during each 30 days and at such other times upon the request of the juvenile’s probation officer, for good cause shown. If it appears at such hearing that the purpose of the order of confinement has been achieved, the juvenile shall be released on probation for such period and under such conditions as the court may specify and remain subject to the order suspending commitment to the State Department of Juvenile Justice. If the juvenile’s commitment to the Department has been suspended as provided in subsection B of this section, and if the court determines at the first or any subsequent review hearing that the juvenile is consistently failing to comply with the conditions specified by the court or the policies and program requirements of the facility, then the court shall order that the juvenile be committed to the State Department of Juvenile Justice. If the court determines at the first or any subsequent review hearing that the juvenile is not actively involved in any community facility based treatment program through no fault of his own, then the court shall order that the juvenile be released under such conditions as the court may specify subject to the suspended commitment.

A juvenile may only be ordered confined pursuant to this section to a facility in compliance with standards established by the State Board for such placements. Standards for these facilities shall require juveniles placed pursuant to this section for a period which exceeds 30 calendar days be provided separate services for their rehabilitation, consistent with the intent of this section.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall assist the localities or combinations thereof in implementing this section consistent with the statewide plan required by §

16.1-309.4

and pursuant to standards promulgated by the State Board, in order to ensure the availability and reasonable access of each court to the facilities the use of which is authorized by this section.

C1.

The appearance of the juvenile before the court for a hearing pursuant to subsection C may be by (i) personal appearance before the judge or (ii) use of two-way electronic video and audio communication. If two-way electronic video and audio communication is used, a judge may exercise all powers conferred by law and all communications and proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner as if the appearance were in person, and any documents filed may be transmitted by facsimile process. A facsimile may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom sent, and returned in the same manner, and with the same force, effect, authority, and liability as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used for an appearance shall meet the standards as set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

1985, c. 260; 1989, c. 733; 1995, cc. 696, 699; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, c. 978; 2001, c. 140; 2012, c. 94; 2013, c. 651; 2015, c. 391.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of a state pool of funds to be allocated to community policy and management teams under the Children’s Services Act, see §

2.2-5211

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 978, effective July 1, 2002, rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 140, in subsection A, inserted “of a violent juvenile felony,” inserted present clause (ii) and redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as present clauses (iii) and (iv); and substituted “shall” for “may” in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 94 added subsection C1; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 651, in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “and the juvenile is eligible for commitment pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

” and deleted “if he is eligible pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

” following “Department.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 391 added the second sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-285.
Duration of commitments.

Except as provided in §

16.1-285.1

, all commitments under this chapter shall be for an indeterminate period having regard to the welfare of the juvenile and interests of the public, but no juvenile committed hereunder shall be held or detained longer than thirty-six continuous months or after such juvenile has attained the age of twenty-one years. However, the thirty-six month limitation shall not apply in cases of commitment for an act of murder or manslaughter. The Department shall have the authority to discharge any juvenile or person from its custody, including releasing a juvenile or person to parole supervision, in accordance with policies and procedures established by the State Board and with other provisions of law. Parole supervision programs shall be operated through the court services units established pursuant to §

16.1-233

. A juvenile or person who violates the conditions of his parole granted pursuant to this section may be proceeded against for a revocation or modification of parole status pursuant to §

16.1-291

.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-180; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1985, cc. 260, 388; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, cc. 954, 981, 988; 2001, c. 853.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “chapter” for “law,” substituted “juvenile” for “child” in three places, inserted “longer than thirty-six continuous months or” following “detained,” and deleted “however, any child” following “has attained the age of twenty-one years,” added the present second sentence, inserted “Any juvenile” preceding “who is committed” in the present third sentence, and substituted “juvenile” for “child” in the last sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 954, 981, and 988 are identical, and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “Any juvenile who is committed under this law as an abused or neglected child or a child in need of services shall have the right upon request to be released from such commitment at the age of eighteen years.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 853 in the third sentence, inserted “or person” following “juvenile” and inserted “including releasing a juvenile or person to parole supervision,” and added the fourth and fifth sentences.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1505 (1974).

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 16.1-285.1.
Commitment of serious offenders.

In the case of a juvenile fourteen years of age or older who has been found guilty of an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult, and either (i) the juvenile is on parole for an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult, (ii) the juvenile was committed to the state for an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult within the immediately preceding twelve months, (iii) the felony offense is punishable by a term of confinement of greater than twenty years if the felony was committed by an adult, or (iv) the juvenile has been previously adjudicated delinquent for an offense which if committed by an adult would be a felony punishable by a term of confinement of twenty years or more, and the circuit court, or the juvenile or family court, as the case may be, finds that commitment under this section is necessary to meet the rehabilitative needs of the juvenile and would serve the best interests of the community, then the court may order the juvenile committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice for placement in a juvenile correctional center for the period of time prescribed pursuant to this section.Alternatively, in order to determine if a juvenile, transferred from a juvenile and domestic relations district court to a circuit court pursuant to §

16.1-269.1

, appropriately qualifies for commitment pursuant to this section, notwithstanding the inapplicability of the qualification criteria set forth in clauses (i) through (iv), the circuit court may consider the commitment criteria set forth in subdivisions 1, 2, and 3 of subsection B as well as other components of the juvenile’s life history and, if upon such consideration in the opinion of the court the needs of the juvenile and the interests of the community would clearly best be served by commitment hereunder, may so commit the juvenile.

Prior to committing any juvenile pursuant to this section, the court shall consider:

The juvenile’s age;

The seriousness and number of the present offenses, including (i) whether the offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner; (ii) whether the offense was against persons or property, with greater weight being given to offenses against persons, especially if death or injury resulted; (iii) whether the offense involved the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon by brandishing, displaying, threatening with or otherwise employing such weapon; and (iv) the nature of the juvenile’s participation in the alleged offense;

The record and previous history of the juvenile in this or any other jurisdiction, including (i) the number and nature of previous contacts with courts, (ii) the number and nature of prior periods of probation, (iii) the number and nature of prior commitments to juvenile correctional centers, (iv) the number and nature of previous residential and community-based treatments, (v) whether previous adjudications and commitments were for delinquent acts that involved the infliction of serious bodily injury, and (vi) whether the offense is part of a repetitive pattern of similar adjudicated offenses; and

The Department’s estimated length of stay.Such commitment order must be supported by a determination that the interests of the juvenile and community require that the juvenile be placed under legal restraint or discipline and that the juvenile is not a proper person to receive treatment or rehabilitation through other juvenile programs or facilities.

In ordering commitment pursuant to this section, the court shall specify a period of commitment not to exceed seven years or the juvenile’s twenty-first birthday, whichever shall occur first. The court may also order a period of determinate or indeterminate parole supervision to follow the commitment but the total period of commitment and parole supervision shall not exceed seven years or the juvenile’s twenty-first birthday, whichever occurs first.

Upon receipt of a juvenile committed under the provisions of this section, the Department shall evaluate the juvenile for the purpose of considering placement of the juvenile in an appropriate juvenile correctional center for the time prescribed by the committing court. Such a placement decision shall be made based on the availability of treatment programs at the facility; the level of security at the facility; the offense for which the juvenile has been committed; and the welfare, age and gender of the juvenile.

The court which commits the juvenile to the Department under this section shall have continuing jurisdiction over the juvenile throughout his commitment. The continuing jurisdiction of the court shall not prevent the Department from removing the juvenile from a juvenile correctional center without prior court approval for the sole purposes of routine or emergency medical treatment, routine educational services, or family emergencies.

Any juvenile committed under the provisions of this section shall not be released at a time earlier than that specified by the court in its dispositional order except as provided for in §

16.1-285.2

. The Department may petition the committing court, notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order, for a hearing as provided for in §

16.1-285.2

for an earlier release of the juvenile when good cause exists for an earlier release. In addition, notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order, the Department shall petition the committing court for a determination as to the continued commitment of each juvenile sentenced under this section at least sixty days prior to the second anniversary of the juvenile’s date of commitment and sixty days prior to each annual anniversary thereafter.

History.

1985, c. 260; 1989, c. 717; 1992, c. 484; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2001, c. 563; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 284.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile correction center” for “learning center” in four places, in subsection A, deleted “or” at the end of clause (ii), inserted “or” at the end of clause (iii), added clause (iv), in subdivision B 4, substituted “estimated length” for “recommended length” and deleted “based on treatment goals enumerated in the social history report” following “of stay,” added the second sentence in subsection C, in subsection D, in the second sentence, inserted “the availability of treatment programs at the facility; the level of security at the facility; the offense for which the juvenile has been committed; and” following “shall be made based on,” and inserted “age and gender” preceding “of the juvenile.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 563 added the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 284, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order,” twice in subsection F.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1075 (1994).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 81, 86.

§ 16.1-285.2.
Release and review hearing for serious offender.

Upon receipt of a petition of the Department of Juvenile Justice for a hearing concerning a juvenile committed under §

16.1-285.1

, the court shall schedule a hearing within thirty days and shall appoint counsel for the juvenile pursuant to §

16.1-266

. The court shall provide a copy of the petition, the progress report required by this section, and notice of the time and place of the hearing to (i) the juvenile, (ii) the juvenile’s parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco parentis, (iii) the juvenile’s guardian ad litem, if any, (iv) the juvenile’s legal counsel, and (v) the attorney for the Commonwealth who prosecuted the juvenile during the delinquency proceeding. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall provide notice of the time and place of the hearing by first-class mail to the last known address of any victim of the offense for which the juvenile was committed if such victim has submitted a written request for notification to the attorney for the Commonwealth.

The petition shall be filed in the committing court and shall be accompanied by a progress report from the Department. This report shall describe (i) the facility and living arrangement provided for the juvenile by the Department, (ii) the services and treatment programs afforded the juvenile, (iii) the juvenile’s progress toward treatment goals and objectives, which shall include a summary of his educational progress, (iv) the juvenile’s potential for danger to either himself or the community, and (v) a comprehensive aftercare plan for the juvenile.

At the hearing the court shall consider the progress report. The court may also consider additional evidence from (i) probation officers, the juvenile correctional center, treatment professionals, and the court service unit; (ii) the juvenile, his legal counsel, parent, guardian or family member; or (iii) other sources the court deems relevant. The hearing and all records relating thereto shall be governed by the confidentiality provisions of Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.) of this chapter.

At the conclusion of the hearing and notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order, the court shall order (i) continued commitment of the juvenile to the Department for completion of the original determinate period of commitment or such lesser time as the court may order or (ii) release of the juvenile under such terms and conditions as the court may prescribe. In making a determination under this section, the court shall consider (i) the experiences and character of the juvenile before and after commitment, (ii) the nature of the offenses that the juvenile was found to have committed, (iii) the manner in which the offenses were committed, (iv) the protection of the community, (v) the recommendations of the Department, and (vi) any other factors the court deems relevant. The order of the court shall be final and not subject to appeal.

In the case of a juvenile convicted as an adult and committed as a serious offender under subdivision A 1 of §

16.1-272

, at the conclusion of the review hearing and notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order, the circuit court shall order (i) the juvenile to begin serving any adult sentence in whole or in part that may include any remaining part of the original determinate period of commitment, or (ii) the suspension of the unserved portion of the adult sentence in whole or in part based upon the juvenile’s successful completion of the commitment as a serious offender, or (iii) the continued commitment of the juvenile to the Department for completion of the original determinate period of commitment or such lesser time as the court may order, or (iv) the release of the juvenile under such terms and conditions as the court may prescribe.

B1.

The appearance of the juvenile before the court may be by (i) personal appearance before the judge, or (ii) use of two-way electronic video and audio communication. If two-way electronic video and audio communication is used, a judge may exercise all powers conferred by law and all communications and proceedings shall be conducted in the same manner as if the appearance were in person, and any documents filed may be transmitted by facsimile process. A facsimile may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom sent, and returned in the same manner, and with the same force, effect, authority, and liability as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures. Any two-way electronic video and audio communication system used for an appearance shall meet the standards as set forth in subsection B of §

19.2-3.1

.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1995, c. 536; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2002, c. 511; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 284.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and added the last sentence of subsection A, added subdivision B 1, and substituted “juvenile correctional center” for “learning center” near the middle of clause (i) of subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 511 added subsection E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 284, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and notwithstanding the terms of any plea agreement or commitment order” in subsections D and E.

§ 16.1-286.
Cost of maintenance; approval of placement; semiannual review.

When the court determines that the behavior of a child within its jurisdiction is such that it cannot be dealt with in the child’s own locality or with the resources of his locality, the judge shall refer the child to the locality’s family assessment and planning team for assessment and a recommendation for services. Based on this recommendation, the court may take custody and place the child, pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 5 of §

16.1-278.4

or subdivision A 13 b of §

16.1-278.8

, in a private or locally operated public facility, or nonresidential program with funding in accordance with the Children’s Services Act (§

2.2-5200

et seq.). No child shall be placed outside the Commonwealth by a court without first complying with the appropriate provisions of Chapter 11 (§

63.2-1100

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or with regulations of the State Board of Social Services relating to resident children placed out of the Commonwealth.The Board shall establish a per diem allowance to cover the cost of such placements. This allowance may be drawn from funds allocated through the state pool of funds to the community policy and management team of the locality where the child resides as such residence is determined by the court.

The court service unit of the locality which made the placement shall be responsible for monitoring and supervising all children placed pursuant to this section. The court shall receive and review, at least semiannually, recommendations concerning the continued care of each child in such placements.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-181.1; 1976, c. 464; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 310; 1982, c. 166; 1987, c. 667; 1989, c. 733; 1991, c. 534; 1992, cc. 732, 837, 880; 1995, cc. 696, 699; 1997, c. 347; 1999, c. 669; 2003, c. 579; 2015, c. 366; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 283.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of a state pool of funds to be allocated to community policy and management teams under the Children’s Services Act, see §

2.2-5211

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 696 and 699, cls. 2 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 696 and 699 are identical, and in subsection A, in the second sentence deleted “b” following “subdivision 5”, inserted “programs and” following “excluding those”, and substituted “§

16.1-309.5

” for “§§ 16.1-313 and

16.1-322.1

.” For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “with funding in accordance with the Comprehensive Services Act for At-Risk Youth and families (§ 2.1-745 et seq.)” for “and approved by the State Board of Juvenile Justice” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 579 substituted “pursuant to §

16.1-290

” for “in such manner as the court may direct, reasonable sums commensurate with the ability to pay toward the support and treatment of the child placed in a program pursuant to this section” in the second paragraph of subsection A; and deleted former subsection C, which read: “The Director shall cause a current roster to be maintained concerning the whereabouts of all children placed pursuant to this section.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Children’s Services Act” for “Comprehensive Services Act for At-Risk Youth and Families” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 283, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the last four sentences in the second paragraph of subsection A, which read “The cost, however, shall not exceed that amount which would be incurred if the services required by the child were provided in a juvenile facility operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice. However, when the court determines after an investigation and a hearing that the child’s parent or other person legally obligated to provide support is financially able to contribute to support of the child, the court may order that the parent or other legally obligated person pay, pursuant to §

16.1-290

. If the parent or other obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against him for contempt. Alternatively, the court, after reasonable notice to the obligor, may enter an order adjudicating that the obligor is delinquent and such order shall have the effect of a civil judgment when duly docketed in the manner prescribed for the docketing of other judgments for money provided.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Transportation of juveniles. —

Statute authorizes the chief judge of a juvenile and domestic relations district court to order that local law-enforcement personnel shall be responsible for transporting violent and disruptive juveniles to court-ordered out-of-state destinations; when a local law-enforcement officer is transporting a prisoner in another state, he has only such law-enforcement authority over the prisoner as may be provided by the laws of that state. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable C.T. Woody, Jr., Sheriff, City of Richmond, No. 16-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 12 (4/6/17).

§ 16.1-287.
Transfer of information upon commitment; information to be furnished by and to local school boards.

Whenever the court commits a child to the Department of Juvenile Justice, or to any other institution or agency, it shall transmit with the order of commitment copies of the clinical reports, predisposition study and other information it has pertinent to the care and treatment of the child. The Department shall not be responsible for any such committed child until it has received the court order and the information concerning the child. All local school boards shall be required to furnish the Department promptly with any information from their files that the Department deems to be necessary in the classification, evaluation, placement or treatment of any child committed to the Department. The Department of Juvenile Justice’s Education Division, pursuant to § 22.1-289, shall likewise be required to furnish local school boards academic, and career and technical education and related achievement information promptly from its files that the local school board may deem necessary when children are returned to the community from the Department’s care. The Department and other institutions or agencies shall give to the court such information concerning the child as the court at any time requires. All such information shall be treated as confidential.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-181; 1956, c. 555; 1974, cc. 44, 45, 266; 1977, c. 559; 1981, c. 487; 1989, c. 733; 2001, c. 483; 2005, c. 154; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “their files that” for “its files which” in the third sentence, and in the fourth sentence, substituted “and career and technical education” for “vocational” and substituted “that” for “which.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 154 inserted “of Correctional Education pursuant to §§ 22.1-289 and 22.1-344, in cooperation with the Department of Juvenile Justice” in the fourth sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and substituted “Juvenile Justice’s Education Division” for “Correctional Education” and deleted “and 22.1-344, in cooperation with the Department of Juvenile Justice” following “pursuant to § 22.1-289.”

§ 16.1-288.
Protection of religious affiliations.

In placing a child under the guardianship or custody of an individual or of a private agency or institution, the court shall whenever practicable select a person, or an agency or institution governed by persons, of the same religious faith as that of the parents of the child, or in case of a difference in the religious faith of the parents and religious faith of the child, or, if the religious faith of the child is not ascertainable, then of the faith of either of the parents or of the child, unless the parent or parents of the child waive such selection.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-182; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559.

§ 16.1-289.
Review of order of commitment.

The juvenile court or the circuit court, as the case may be, of its own motion may reopen any case and may modify or revoke its order. The juvenile court or the circuit court shall before modifying or revoking such order grant a hearing after notice in writing to the complainant, if any, and to the person or agency having custody of the child; provided, however, that this section shall not apply in the case of a child committed to the Department after sixty days from the date of the order of commitment.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-183; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 86.

§ 16.1-289.1.
Motions to reconsider orders for participation in continuing programs.

When a person is ordered to participate in therapy, counseling or similar continuing programs, a motion may be filed with the court to reconsider the order, whether interlocutory or final, or the terms and conditions of participation at any time after the order is entered. The motion shall be heard within thirty days. Any order disposing of such motion shall be deemed to be a final order for purposes of appeal pursuant to Article 11 (§

16.1-296

et seq.), of this chapter.

History.

1988, c. 771.

§ 16.1-290.
Support of committed juvenile; support from estate of juvenile.

Whenever (i) legal custody of a juvenile is vested by the court in someone other than his parents or (ii) a juvenile is placed in temporary shelter care regardless of whether or not legal custody is retained by his parents, after due notice in writing to the parents, the court, pursuant to §§

20-108.1

and

20-108.2

, or the Department of Social Services, pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2, shall order the parents to pay support to the Department of Social Services. If the parents fail or refuse to pay such support, the court may proceed against them for contempt, or the order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a juvenile who is committed to the Department pursuant to subdivision A 14 or A 17 of §

16.1-278.8

.

If a juvenile has an estate in the hands of a guardian or trustee, the guardian or trustee may be required to pay for his education and maintenance so long as there may be funds for that purpose.

Whenever a juvenile is placed in foster care by the court, the court shall order and decree that the parents shall pay the Department of Social Services pursuant to §§

20-108.1

,

20-108.2

,

63.2-909

, and

63.2-1910

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 16.1-184, 16.1-185; 1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 177; 1977, c. 559; 1995, cc. 448, 817; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2003, c. 579; 2006, c. 282; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 283; 2022, cc. 414, 415.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 283, cl. 2 provides: “That any child support order entered pursuant to the provisions of former subsection D of §

16.1-290

of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to the enactment of this act is terminated, provided, however, that the provisions of this enactment clause do not modify, reduce, or forgive any arrearages or liens accumulated or established under any order in effect through June 30, 2021.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, added the clause (i) and (ii) designations, added the clause (a) and (b) designations, deleted “whenever” at the end of clause (i), added “or” at the end of clause (a), and in clause (b), inserted “placed in temporary physical custody of the Department pursuant to subdivision 4a of §

16.1-278.8

” preceding “after due notice,” and substituted “cover all or part of the cost of support” for “cover in whole or in part the support.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 579, in subsection A, deleted the clause (ii) (a) designation, deleted “or” following “by his parents,” and deleted former clause (ii) (b), which read: “placed in temporary physical custody of the Department pursuant to subdivision 4a of §

16.1-278.8

”; and added subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 282, in subsection A, substituted the language beginning “in writing to the parents” for “to the parents or other persons legally obligated to care for and support the juvenile, and after an investigation and hearing, the court shall order and decree that the parent or other legally obligated person shall pay, in such a manner as the court may direct, a reasonable sum commensurate with the ability to pay, that will cover all or part of the cost of support and treatment of the juvenile after the decree is entered” in the first sentence and substituted the second sentence for “If the parent or other legally obligated person willfully fails or refuses to pay such sum, the court may proceed against him for contempt, or the order may be filed and shall have the effect of a civil judgment”; substituted “parents” for “parent or other legally obligated person” in subsection C; and in subsection D, inserted “or A 17,” substituted “Department of Social Services” for “appropriate division in the Department of Social Services responsible for child support enforcement,” and added the last two sentences.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 283, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in subsection A; deleted former subsection D, which read “Whenever a juvenile is placed in temporary custody of the Department pursuant to subdivision A 4a of §

16.1-278.8

or committed to the Department pursuant to subdivision A 14 or A 17 of §

16.1-278.8

, the Department shall apply for child support with the Department of Social Services. The parents shall be responsible for child support, pursuant to § §

20-108.1

and

20-108.2

, from the date the Department receives the juvenile. The Department shall notify in writing the parents of their responsibilities to pay child support from the date the Department receives the juvenile.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 414 and 415 are identical, and in subsection A in the last sentence, deleted “placed in temporary custody of the Department pursuant to subdivision A 4a of §

16.1-278.8

or” following “who is.”

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 16.1-290.1.
Payment for court-ordered counseling, treatment or programs.

The court shall order the participant in any treatment, counseling or other program for the rehabilitation of a minor child or his family to pay as much of the applicable fee for participation as such person is able to pay. A finding of guilt shall not be required for the court so to order payment.

History.

2004, c. 573.